Hawaii statutes.
§235-31 Apportionment; property factor;
owned and used property. Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its
original cost. Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the
net annual rental rate. Net annual rental rate is the annual rental rate paid
by the taxpayer less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from
subrentals. [L 1967, c 33, pt of §1; HRS §235-31]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next